Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-107
State Fair Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The State Fair Cash Fund is created. The Tax Commissioner may use the fund to defray the cost of implementing the check-off program under section 77-27,119.05. The Nebraska State Fair shall use the fund to carry out the public-private partnerships established to enhance the work of the Nebraska State Fair. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2003, LB 72, § 5.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.